Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 462.273 is amended to read:
462.273. (1) No member, employee or appointee of the Oregon Racing  Commission, or the im-
mediate family member of such a person, may:
[(1)] (a)  Own or have any other financial interest in any animal  participating in any race meet
in Oregon.
[(2)] (b) Own or have any other financial  interest in any race meet, public training track or race
course in Oregon.
[(3)] (c)  Bet  or wager, in any manner, on any race meet held under the license and supervision
of the commission if such individual acts in an official  capacity in connection with that race meet ,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section .
(2) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not prohibit an  officer or employee of the com-
mission from placing a bet or wager in the course of carrying out official auditing duties.
Enrolled Senate Bill 856 (SB 856-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 856 (SB 856-A) Page 2